Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-155
Proof of hearing impairment.

When an appointing authority has reason to believe that a person is not deaf or hard of hearing or is not dependent on an interpreter to ensure receptive or expressive communication, the appointing authority may require the person to furnish reasonable proof of his or her need for an interpreter.

Laws 1987, LB 376, § 6;

Laws 1997, LB 851, § 6.